Texas statutes.
ESTATES CODE

TITLE 3. GUARDIANSHIP AND RELATED PROCEDURES

SUBTITLE E. ADMINISTRATION OF GUARDIANSHIP

CHAPTER 1154. INVENTORY, APPRAISEMENT, AND LIST OF CLAIMS

SUBCHAPTER A. APPRAISERS

Sec. 1154.001. APPOINTMENT OF APPRAISERS. (a) After letters of guardianship of the estate are granted, the court, for good cause shown, on the court's own motion or the motion of any interested person, shall appoint at least one but not more than three disinterested persons who are residents of the county in which the letters were granted to appraise the ward's property.

(b) If the court makes an appointment under Subsection (a) and part of the estate is located in a county other than the county in which the letters were granted, the court, if the court considers it necessary, may appoint at least one but not more than three disinterested persons who are residents of the county in which the relevant part of the estate is located to appraise the estate property located in that county.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1154.002. APPRAISERS' FEES. An appraiser appointed by the court is entitled to receive a reasonable fee, payable out of the estate, for the performance of the appraiser's duties as an appraiser.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1154.003. FAILURE OR REFUSAL TO ACT BY APPRAISERS. If an appraiser appointed under Section 1154.001 fails or refuses to act, the court shall remove the appraiser and appoint one or more appraisers.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

SUBCHAPTER B. REQUIREMENTS FOR INVENTORY, APPRAISEMENT, AND LIST OF CLAIMS

Sec. 1154.051. INVENTORY AND APPRAISEMENT. (a) Not later than the 30th day after the date the guardian of the estate qualifies, unless a longer period is granted by the court, the guardian shall file with the court clerk a single written instrument that contains a verified, full, and detailed inventory of all the ward's property that has come into the guardian's possession or of which the guardian has knowledge. The inventory must:

(1) include:

(A) all the ward's real property located in this state; and

(B) all the ward's personal property regardless of where the property is located; and

(2) specify:

(A) which portion of the property is separate property and which is community property; and

(B) if the property is owned in common with other persons, the ward's interest in that property.

(b) The guardian shall:

(1) set out in the inventory the guardian's appraisement of the fair market value of each item in the inventory on the date of the grant of letters of guardianship; or

(2) if the court has appointed an appraiser for the estate:

(A) determine the fair market value of each item in the inventory with the assistance of the appraiser; and

(B) set out in the inventory the appraisement made by the appraiser.

(c) The court for good cause shown may require the guardian to file the inventory and appraisement not later than the 30th day after the date of qualification of the guardian.

(d) The inventory, when approved by the court and filed with the court clerk, is for all purposes the inventory and appraisement of the estate referred to in this title.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 6.041, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1154.052. LIST OF CLAIMS. The guardian of the estate shall make and attach to the inventory and appraisement required by Section 1154.051 a complete list of claims due or owing to the ward. The list of claims must state:

(1) the name and, if known, address of each person indebted to the ward; and

(2) regarding each claim:

(A) the nature of the debt, whether it is a note, bill, bond, or other written obligation, or whether it is an account or verbal contract;

(B) the date the debt was incurred;

(C) the date the debt was or is due;

(D) the amount of the claim, the rate of interest on the claim, and the period for which the claim bears interest; and

(E) if any portion of the claim is held in common with others, the interest of the estate in the claim.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 6.042, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1154.053. AFFIDAVIT OF GUARDIAN. The guardian of the estate shall attach to the inventory, appraisement, and list of claims the guardian's affidavit, subscribed and sworn to before an officer in the county authorized by law to administer oaths, that the inventory, appraisement, and list of claims are a true and complete statement of the property and claims of the estate of which the guardian has knowledge.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1154.054. APPROVAL OR DISAPPROVAL BY THE COURT. (a) On the filing of the inventory, appraisement, and list of claims with the court clerk, the judge shall examine and approve or disapprove the inventory, appraisement, and list of claims.

(b) If the judge approves the inventory, appraisement, and list of claims, the judge shall enter an order to that effect.

(c) If the judge does not approve the inventory, appraisement, or list of claims, the judge:

(1) shall enter an order to that effect requiring the filing of another inventory, appraisement, or list of claims, whichever is not approved, within a period specified in the order not to exceed 20 days after the date the order is entered; and

(2) may, if considered necessary, appoint new appraisers.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1154.055. FAILURE OF JOINT GUARDIANS TO FILE INVENTORY, APPRAISEMENT, AND LIST OF CLAIMS. (a) If more than one guardian of the estate qualifies to serve, any one or more of the guardians, on the neglect of the other guardians, may make and file an inventory, appraisement, and list of claims.

(b) A guardian who neglects to make or file an inventory, appraisement, and list of claims may not interfere with and does not have any power over the estate after another guardian makes and files an inventory, appraisement, and list of claims.

(c) The guardian who files the inventory, appraisement, and list of claims is entitled to the whole administration unless, not later than the 60th day after the date the guardian files the inventory, appraisement, and list of claims, each of the delinquent guardians files with the court a written, sworn, and reasonable excuse that the court considers satisfactory. The court shall enter an order removing one or more delinquent guardians and revoking those guardians' letters if:

(1) an excuse is not filed; or

(2) the court does not consider the filed excuse sufficient.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

SUBCHAPTER C. CHANGES TO INVENTORY, APPRAISEMENT, AND LIST OF CLAIMS

Sec. 1154.101. DISCOVERY OF ADDITIONAL PROPERTY OR CLAIMS. If after the filing of the inventory, appraisement, and list of claims the guardian of the estate acquires possession or knowledge of property or claims of the estate not included in the inventory, appraisement, and list of claims, the guardian shall promptly file with the court clerk a verified, full, and detailed supplemental inventory, appraisement, and list of claims.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1154.102. ADDITIONAL INVENTORY AND APPRAISEMENT OR LIST OF CLAIMS. (a) On the written complaint of any interested person that property or claims of the estate have not been included in the filed inventory, appraisement, and list of claims, the guardian of the estate shall be cited to appear before the court in which the cause is pending and show cause why the guardian should not be required to make and file an additional inventory and appraisement or list of claims, or both.

(b) After hearing the complaint, if the court is satisfied of the truth of the complaint, the court shall enter an order requiring the guardian to make and file an additional inventory and appraisement or list of claims, or both. The additional inventory and appraisement or list of claims:

(1) must be made and filed in the same manner as the original inventory and appraisement or list of claims within the period prescribed by the court, not to exceed 20 days after the date of the order; and

(2) may include only property or claims not previously included in the inventory and appraisement or list of claims.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1154.103. CORRECTION OF INVENTORY, APPRAISEMENT, OR LIST OF CLAIMS FOR ERRONEOUS OR UNJUST ITEM. (a) A person interested in an estate who considers an inventory, appraisement, or list of claims filed by the guardian of the estate to be erroneous or unjust in any particular form may:

(1) file a written complaint setting forth the alleged erroneous or unjust item; and

(2) have the guardian cited to appear before the court and show cause why the item should not be corrected.

(b) On the hearing of the complaint, if the court is satisfied from the evidence that the inventory, appraisement, or list of claims is erroneous or unjust as alleged in the complaint, the court shall enter an order:

(1) specifying the erroneous or unjust item and the corrections to be made; and

(2) appointing an appraiser to make a new appraisement correcting the erroneous or unjust item and requiring the filing of the new appraisement not later than the 20th day after the date of the order.

(c) The court, on the court's own motion or a motion of the guardian of the estate, may also have a new appraisement made for the purposes described by this section.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1154.104. REAPPRAISEMENT. (a) A reappraisement made, filed, and approved by the court replaces the original appraisement. Not more than one reappraisement may be made.

(b) Notwithstanding Subsection (a), a person interested in an estate may object to a reappraisement regardless of whether the court has approved the reappraisement. If the court finds that the reappraisement is erroneous or unjust, the court shall appraise the property on the basis of the evidence before the court.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

SUBCHAPTER D. USE OF INVENTORY, APPRAISEMENT, AND LIST OF CLAIMS AS EVIDENCE

Sec. 1154.151. USE OF INVENTORY, APPRAISEMENT, AND LIST OF CLAIMS AS EVIDENCE. Each inventory, appraisement, and list of claims that has been made, filed, and approved in accordance with law; the record of the inventory, appraisement, and list of claims; or a copy of an original or the record that has been certified under the seal of the county court affixed by the clerk:

(1) may be given in evidence in any court of this state in any suit by or against the guardian of the estate; and

(2) is not conclusive for or against the guardian of the estate if it is shown that:

(A) any property or claim of the estate is not shown in the inventory, appraisement, or list of claims; or

(B) the value of the property or claim of the estate exceeded the value shown in the appraisement or list of claims.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.